Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Community Health Workers Act".

HB1831 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280.1 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in the Oklahoma Community Health Workers Act:
1. "Certified community health worker" means a community health
worker to whom the State Department of Health has issued a
certificate to practice as a certified community health worker in
this state;
2. "Community health worker" means a frontline health worker
who has a shared understanding of and is a trusted member of the
community being served;
3. "Core competencies" are defined as the knowledge and skills
a certified community health worker is expected to demonstrate in
order to carry out the mission and goals of the profession as
defined by the Department through the promulgation of administrative
regulations in accordance with state guidelines; and
4. "Department" means the State Department of Health as
established to direct guidance, in collaboration with the State
Community Health Worker Association or Advisory Committee, in
relation to community health worker training, certification, and
recertification protocols.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280.2 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
HB1831 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

A. The State Department of Health shall establish a certificate
for community health workers. This certification shall be
voluntary.
B. A certified community health worker may:
1. Serve as a liaison between health and social services and
the community, including faith-based organizations, to facilitate
access to services and improve the quality and cultural competence
of service delivery;
2. Assist in identifying and communicating gaps in current
community and health care resources; and
3. Build individual and community capacity by increasing health
knowledge and self-sufficiency through a range of activities such as
outreach, community education, coaching, mentoring, social support,
and advocacy, including efforts within faith-based settings.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280.3 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Eligibility to apply for voluntary certification in order to be
eligible to apply for community health worker certification, an
individual shall:
1. Be a legal United States resident;
2. Be a resident of Oklahoma;
3. Be at least eighteen (18) years of age; and

HB1831 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

4. Provide evidence to the Department of his or her work
experience as a community health worker, demonstrating a minimum of
one thousand (1,000) practical hours and recommendation from a
supervising provider, shall be considered certified under this work
experience pathway provision.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280.4 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Commissioner of Health shall promulgate rules to:
1. Adopt a set of standards for the approval of certified
community health workers' initial coursework or curriculum;
2. Establish examination administration requirements for the
Department or one or more designees;
3. Define minimum qualifications for applicants to be
certified; and
4. Establish the criteria for granting, renewing, denying,
suspending, and revoking a certificate to uphold health standards
and safety.
B. The Commissioner may also promulgate rules to establish
partnerships with faith-based organizations to enhance community
health outreach and service delivery, including, but not limited to:
1. Recognizing faith-based organizations as eligible entities
for community health care worker training and certification programs
when they meet established state standards;
HB1831 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. Facilitating collaboration between community health care
workers and faith-based organizations to improve health access,
prevention, and health literacy efforts in underserved communities;
3. Supporting faith-based health initiatives through technical
assistance and programmatic support for community health care
workers working within congregations and religious institutions;
4. Encouraging the integration of community health care workers
into existing faith-based outreach programs to enhance culturally
competent care and strengthen trust in community health efforts.
C. The Commissioner shall prescribe fees for the certified
community health worker examination, initial certification, and
certification renewal.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.









HB1831 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.